Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
Article 1 Official Oaths

45-3-1.
Oaths required in addition to oath of office and constitutional oath.

Every public officer shall:

Take the oath of office;

Take any oath prescribed by the Constitution of Georgia;

Swear that he or she is not the holder of any unaccounted for public money due this state or any political subdivision or authority thereof;

Swear that he or she is not the holder of any office of trust under the government of the United States, any other state, or any foreign state which he or she is by the laws of the State of Georgia prohibited from holding;

Swear that he or she is otherwise qualified to hold said office according to the Constitution and laws of Georgia;

Swear that he or she will support the Constitution of the United States and of this state; and

If elected by any circuit or district, swear that he or she has been a resident thereof for the time required by the Constitution and laws of this state.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 134; Code 1868, § 129; Code 1873, § 139; Code 1882, § 139; Civil Code 1895, § 234; Civil Code 1910, § 269; Code 1933, § 89-302; Ga. L. 1986, p. 168, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 510, § 1.

Cross references.

Disqualification from public office of holders of unaccounted-for public money due state, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. II, Sec. II, Para. III and §

45-2-1

.

Criminal penalty for violation of oath by public officer, §

16-10-1

.

Law reviews.

For article, “The Georgia Bill of Rights: Dead or Alive?,” see 34 Emory L.J. 341 (1985).

45-3-2.
Form and subscription of oath.

The form of the oath prescribed in Code Section 45-3-1 and the oath of office to be taken and subscribed shall be forwarded with the dedimus potestatem and shall be taken and subscribed at the time of receiving the commission before the officer to whom the same is directed and in conformity with any directions.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 135; Code 1868, § 130; Code 1873, § 140; Code 1882, § 140; Civil Code 1895, § 235; Civil Code 1910, § 270; Code 1933, § 89-303.

45-3-3.
Officer authorized to administer oaths; oaths to be written, subscribed, and dated.

When not otherwise provided by law and when not directed in the dedimus potestatem, the oaths of office may be taken before any officer authorized by law to administer an oath. Such oaths shall be written and subscribed by the persons taking them and accompanied by the certificate of such officer, which shall specify the day and year taken.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 136; Code 1868, § 131; Code 1873, § 141; Code 1882, § 141; Civil Code 1895, § 236; Civil Code 1910, § 271; Code 1933, § 89-304.

45-3-4.
Filing of oaths — Generally.

The oaths prescribed in Code Section 45-3-1, when taken by an officer whose general duties are not confined to any one county unless otherwise specially provided, shall be filed with the certificate required by Code Section 45-3-3 in the office of the Governor and, when taken by an officer whose duties are confined to one county, shall be filed as provided in Code Section 45-3-5.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 137; Code 1868, § 132; Code 1873, § 142; Code 1882, § 142; Civil Code 1895, § 237; Civil Code 1910, § 272; Code 1933, § 89-305; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 45.

45-3-5.
Filing of oaths — County officers.

When taken by the judges of the probate courts and the clerks of the superior courts, official oaths shall be filed in the office of the clerk of the superior court and also entered on the minutes of the court. When taken by sheriffs, the oaths shall be filed in the office of the judge of the probate court and shall be entered on the minutes of the superior courts; and when taken by coroners, tax collectors, tax receivers, county treasurers, magistrates, constables, or any other county officers, they shall be filed in the office of the judge of the probate court, who shall enter them on the minutes of his court.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 138; Code 1868, § 133; Code 1873, § 143; Code 1882, § 143; Civil Code 1895, § 238; Civil Code 1910, § 273; Code 1933, § 89-306; Ga. L. 1983, p. 884, § 4-1.

45-3-6.
Filing of oaths — Endorsement of filing time.

The officer in whose office the oaths prescribed in Code Section 45-3-1 are filed must endorse thereon the day and year of filing.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 139; Code 1868, § 134; Code 1873, § 144; Code 1882, § 144; Civil Code 1895, § 239; Civil Code 1910, § 274; Code 1933, § 89-307.

45-3-7.
Oaths of deputies.

Before proceeding to act, all deputies shall take the same oaths as their principals take and the oaths shall be filed and entered on the minutes of the same office with the same endorsement thereon; but this Code section shall not apply to any deputy who may be employed in particular cases only. A deputy sheriff may take his oaths before the sheriff and the oaths may be filed in and entered in the records of the sheriff’s office.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 140; Code 1868, § 135; Code 1873, § 145; Code 1882, § 145; Civil Code 1895, § 240; Civil Code 1910, § 275; Code 1933, § 89-308; Ga. L. 1980, p. 527, § 1.

45-3-8.
Effect of failure to take and file oath generally.

No officer or deputy required by law to take and file the oaths prescribed in Code Section 45-3-1 shall enter upon the duties of his office without first taking and filing the same in the proper office.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 141; Code 1868, § 136; Code 1873, § 146; Code 1882, § 146; Civil Code 1895, § 241; Civil Code 1910, § 276; Code 1933, § 89-309.

45-3-9.
Entry into duties of office without oath.

Any officer or deputy required by law to take and file an official oath who shall enter upon the duties of his office without first taking and filing the same in the proper office shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 141; Code 1868, § 136; Code 1873, § 146; Code 1882, § 146; Penal Code 1895, § 270; Penal Code 1910, § 273; Code 1933, § 89-9901.

45-3-10.
Effect of failure to take and file oath upon validity of official acts.

The official acts of an officer shall be valid regardless of his omission to take and file the oath, except in cases where so specially declared.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 142; Code 1868, § 137; Code 1873, § 147; Code 1882, § 147; Civil Code 1895, § 242; Civil Code 1910, § 277; Code 1933, § 89-310.

45-3-10.1.
Applicability of Code Sections 45-3-1 through 45-3-10.

Code Sections 45-3-1 through 45-3-10 shall apply to all municipal corporations and to all peace officers of this state or any political subdivision or authority thereof.

When taken by municipal officers, official oaths shall be filed in the office of the judge of the probate court. When taken by peace officers, official oaths shall be filed in the records of such department or agency.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-3-10.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 510, § 2.

45-3-11.
Loyalty oath — Persons required to take oath generally.

All persons who are employed by and are on the payroll of the state and are the recipients of wages, per diem, or salary of the state or its departments and agencies, with the exception of pages employed by the General Assembly, and all counties and cities, school districts, and local educational systems throughout the entire state, are required to take an oath that they will support the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of Georgia.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 960, § 1; Ga. L. 1961, p. 552, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 45; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 45; Ga. L. 2002, p. 415, § 45; Ga. L. 2015, p. 385, § 5-3/HB 252.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, deleted “and that they are not members of the Communist Party” following “the Constitution of Georgia” at the end of this Code section.

Cross references.

Investigation of person prior to public employment to ascertain whether such person is a subversive person, §

16-11-13

.

Eligibility of subversive persons to be nominated or elected to public office, §

21-2-7

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 385, § 1-1/HB 252, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘J. Calvin Hill, Jr., Act.’ ”

Law reviews.

For comment on Baggett v. Bullitt, 377 U.S. 360,

84 S. Ct. 1316

,

12 L. Ed. 2

d 377 (1964), see 2 Ga. St. B.J. 123 (1965).

45-3-12.
Loyalty oath — Elected officers.

The loyalty oath required by Code Section 45-3-11, this Code section, and Code Sections 45-3-13 through 45-3-15 shall apply to all elected officers of this state, including the Governor, constitutional officers, elected officials of any political subdivision of the government of Georgia, and local school board officials.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 960, § 5; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 45.

45-3-13.
Loyalty oath — Form.

The oath prescribed in Code Section 45-3-11 shall be in the following form:

“I,
_______________
(Name) a citizen of
_______________
and being an employee of
_______________
and the recipient of public funds for services rendered as such employee, do hereby solemnly swear and affirm that I will support the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of Georgia.”

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 960, § 3; Ga. L. 1950, p. 282, § 1; Ga. L. 2015, p. 385, § 5-4/HB 252.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, deleted “and that I am not a member of the Communist Party” following “the Constitution of Georgia” at the end of this Code section.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 385, § 1-1/HB 252, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘J. Calvin Hill, Jr., Act.’ ”

Law reviews.

For comment on Baggett v. Bullitt, 377 U.S. 360,

84 S. Ct. 1316

,

12 L. Ed. 2

d 377 (1964), see 2 Ga. St. B.J. 123 (1965).

45-3-14.
Effect of failure to sign loyalty oath.

If any person required by Code Sections 45-3-11 through 45-3-13, this Code section, and Code Section 45-3-15 to execute a loyalty oath fails to sign said oath, then the governing authority under whom such person is employed shall cause such person’s name to be taken from the payroll and such person shall not be permitted to receive any payment from the state.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 960, § 4; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 45; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 45.

Law reviews.

For comment on Baggett v. Bullitt, 377 U.S. 360,

84 S. Ct. 1316

,

12 L. Ed. 2

d 377 (1964), see 2 Ga. St. B.J. 123 (1965).

45-3-15.
Proceeding for false swearing when loyalty oath violated.

If any person required to do so by Code Sections 45-3-11 through 45-3-14 and this Code section executes a loyalty oath and subsequently it is proved that said individual has violated the oath, then the governing authority shall institute proceedings in the proper court against such person for false swearing.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 960, § 6; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 45.

Law reviews.

For comment on Baggett v. Bullitt, 377 U.S. 360,

84 S. Ct. 1316

,

12 L. Ed. 2

d 377 (1964), see 2 Ga. St. B.J. 123 (1965).

45-3-16.
Applicability of article.

This article shall apply to the oaths of office of all public officers of this state unless the contrary is expressly provided.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 163; Code 1868, § 158; Code 1873, § 169; Code 1882, § 169; Civil Code 1895, § 265; Civil Code 1910, § 300; Code 1933, § 89-301.